Colorado, session 2026A, HB1382.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-88-101, amend (3)
and (8); repeal (2); and add (3.5), (3.7), and (4.5) as follows:
8-88-101. Definitions.
As used in this article 88:
(2) "Committee" means the Colorado disability funding committee
created in section 8-88-202.
(3) "Contract entity" means an entity the committee CDOO contracts
with pursuant to section 8-88-206 (5) SECTION 8-88-105 (4)(d) to implement
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

section 8-88-206 SECTION 8-88-105.
(3.5) "COLORADO DISABILITY FUNDING AUTHORITY" OR
"AUTHORITY" MEANS THE COLORADO DISABILITY FUNDING AUTHORITY
CREATED IN PART 3 OF THIS ARTICLE 88.
(3.7) "COLORADO DISABILITY FUNDING AUTHORITY BOARD" OR
"AUTHORITY BOARD" MEANS THE COLORADO DISABILITY FUNDING
AUTHORITY BOARD CREATED IN SECTION 8-88-301 (2).
(4.5) "DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 42-1-102 (24).
(8) "Fund" means the disability support fund created in section
8-88-205 SECTION 8-88-104.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-88-102.5, amend (3)
as follows:
8-88-102.5. Comprehensive community integration plan for
individuals with disabilities - review and assessment.
(3) Money for the CDOO to develop, review, and update the plan
is limited to the money in the disability support fund, created in section
8-88-205, and the general assembly shall not appropriate any money from
the general fund for that purpose.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 8-88-103 as
follows:
8-88-103. Appropriation - gifts, grants, and donations.
The general assembly shall appropriate money from the fund or from
any other available source to the department for use by the CDOO for the
purposes specified in this article 88 PART 1. The CDOO may seek, accept,
and expend gifts, grants, or donations from private or public sources for the
purposes of this article 88 PART 1.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add with amended
and relocated provisions 8-88-104 as follows:
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1382

8-88-104. [Formerly 8-88-205] Disability support fund -
registration number account - repeal.
(1) (a) There THE DISABILITY SUPPORT FUND is created in the state
treasury. the disability support fund, which THE FUND consists of money
that may be appropriated or transferred to the fund by the general assembly;
and any gifts, grants, or donations received by the department GIFTS,
GRANTS, OR DONATIONS CREDITED TO THE FUND AND ANY OTHER MONEY
THAT THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY APPROPRIATE OR TRANSFER TO THE
FUND for the purpose of implementing this article 88.
(b) THERE IS CREATED THE REGISTRATION NUMBER ACCOUNT WITHIN
THE FUND, WHICH CONSISTS OF REVENUE COLLECTED FROM THE SALE OF
UNIQUELY VALUABLE REGISTRATION NUMBERS PURSUANT TO SECTION
8-88-105. THE MONEY IN THE REGISTRATION NUMBER ACCOUNT IS:
(I) CONTINUOUSLY APPROPRIATED TO THE CDOO TO PAY THE
CONTRACTING ENTITY FOR THEIR SERVICES IN IMPLEMENTING SECTION
8-88-105; AND
(II) SUBJECT TO ANNUAL APPROPRIATION BY THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY FOR THE DIRECT AND INDIRECT COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS PART 1.
(2) The money in the fund is subject to annual appropriation by the
general assembly for the direct and indirect costs associated with the
implementation of this article 88. Any money in the fund not expended for
the purpose of this section may be invested by the state treasurer as
provided by law. THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT all interest and
income derived from the investment and deposit of money in the fund must
be credited to the fund. Any unexpended and unencumbered money
remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year must remain in the fund for
use as provided in this article 88 and must not be credited or transferred to
the general fund or another fund. If this section is repealed, prior to its
repeal, all unexpended and unencumbered money remaining in the fund
must be transferred to the general fund.
(3) (a) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF SUBSECTION (2) OF
THIS SECTION TO THE CONTRARY, FOR STATE FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027,
SUBJECT TO ANNUAL APPROPRIATION BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, THE
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1382

DEPARTMENT MAY EXPEND MONEY FROM THE FUND FOR VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 84 OF THIS TITLE 8.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (3) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
(4) (a) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF SUBSECTION (2) OF
THIS SECTION TO THE CONTRARY, ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER
SHALL TRANSFER TWENTY-ONE MILLION DOLLARS FROM THE FUND TO THE
GENERAL FUND.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (4) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
(5) (a) BY OCTOBER 1, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL ISSUE A
WARRANT IN THE AMOUNT OF FIVE HUNDRED TWENTY-THREE THOUSAND
THREE HUNDRED FORTY-THREE DOLLARS TO THE COLORADO DISABILITY
FUNDING AUTHORITY CREATED IN SECTION 8-88-301, TO BE PAID FROM THE
FUND.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (5) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add with amended
and relocated provisions section 8-88-105 as follows:
8-88-105. [Formerly 8-88-206] Sale of registration numbers for
license plates - license to buy and sell - market for - royalty payment -
administration - third-party contracting entity.
(1) (a) The state or a person may sell, and the state or a person may
purchase, the exclusive right to use a registration number selected by the
committee CDOO under subsection (2) of this section for the purpose of
registering a vehicle under article 3 of title 42.
(b) The right to use a registration number is a license, the use of
which is subject to compliance with this part 2 SECTION. The duration of the
license is determined by the committee CDOO.
(2) (a) The committee CDOO shall raise money by selling to a buyer
the right to use valuable letter and number combinations for a registration
number.
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1382

(b) (I) The committee shall study the market to determine which
registration numbers are the most valuable. Based on the study, the
committee CDOO shall select the most valuable registration numbers and
request the department of revenue to verify whether plates with the
registration numbers are currently issued. The committee CDOO and the
department of revenue shall enter into an agreement establishing a process
for requesting registration numbers, including specifying the frequency of
these requests.
(II) Upon receiving the committee's CDOO'S request, the
department of revenue shall verify whether the plates are currently issued.
For purposes of this subsection (2)(b), a plate that expires due to the
operation of section 42-3-115 (5)(a) is considered currently issued until the
expiration of the right of the owner of the motor vehicle to which the
expired plate was affixed to apply to use the registration number of the
expired plate when registering another motor vehicle. If the plate is not
currently issued, the department of revenue shall reserve the registration
number until the committee CDOO notifies the department of revenue to
release the registration number.
(III) The committee CDOO shall establish a process for determining
the value of all configurations of registration numbers reserved by the
committee CDOO. The pricing and manner of sale must follow the
established process.
(IV) If a registration number is not currently issued, the committee
CDOO may sell the right to use the registration number in a manner
calculated to bring the highest price; except that the department of revenue
may deny the sale or use of a registration number that is offensive or
inappropriate.
(3) (a) The committee CDOO shall raise revenue by creating a
market, which may include an online site, for the resale of license plate
configurations of registration numbers using methods that are commercially
reasonable, account for expenditures, and ensure the collection of the state's
approval and transfer royalty.
(b) The royalty for the state's approval and transfer of the right to
use a registration number is twenty-five percent of the sale price of the
transfer. At the time of sale, the purchaser shall pay the royalty to the
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1382

committee CDOO. This payment is in addition to and not in lieu of the
normal registration fees, sales or use taxes, or specific ownership tax.
(c) A person shall not sell a registration number, and the department
of revenue shall not assign a registration number, as a result of the right to
use the number being sold to a vehicle unless the registration number was
sold using the market created by the committee PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
(4) (a) The committee CDOO shall notify the department of revenue
when the right to use a registration number has been sold and the committee
CDOO has collected the state's sale proceeds or approval and transfer
royalty. Upon receiving the notice, the department of revenue shall create
a record in Colorado DRIVES, created in section 42-1-211, containing the
name of the buyer; the vehicle identification number, if applicable; and the
corresponding registration number.
(b) If the registration number consists of a combination of letters
and numbers that is not within the normal format of a license plate currently
produced for the department of revenue, the department of revenue shall
issue the plates as personalized plates under section 42-3-211; except that,
notwithstanding section 42-3-211, the committee CDOO may sell, and the
buyer or any subsequent buyer may use:
(I) A registration number or letter of one position; or
(II) Any symbol on the standard American keyboard or approved by
the committee CDOO.
(c) The committee CDOO shall transfer the money collected under
this part 2 PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION to the state treasurer, who shall credit
the money to THE REGISTRATION NUMBER ACCOUNT WITHIN the fund;
EXCEPT THAT, IF THE CDOO CONTRACTS WITH ONE OR MORE PUBLIC OR
PRIVATE ENTITIES PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4)(d) OF THIS SECTION TO
IMPLEMENT AND PERFORM ANY OF THE CDOO'S DUTIES PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION, THE CDOO MAY USE THE MONEY COLLECTED PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION TO PAY THE CONTRACTING ENTITY FOR THEIR SERVICES.
(d) The committee CDOO may contract with one or more public or
private entities to implement this part 2 SECTION AND PERFORM ANY OF THE
DUTIES ASSIGNED TO THE CDOO PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1382

(e) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (4)(c) OF THIS SECTION,
any revenue received by the committee CDOO from the sale of registration
numbers shall MUST be deposited in the fund.
(5) THE SALE OF UNIQUELY VALUABLE REGISTRATION NUMBERS
AUTHORIZED BY THIS SECTION IS A PROPERTY SALE AND, THEREFORE,
REVENUE RECEIVED DUE TO THIS SALE OF PROPERTY DOES NOT CONSTITUTE
STATE FISCAL YEAR SPENDING, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-77-102 (17), FOR
PURPOSES OF SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-88-203, amend
(2)(a)(I) as follows:
8-88-203. Program to assist individuals to obtain disability
benefits.
(2) (a) (I) The committee shall review the proposed programs and
shall award a contract or grant to one or more of the entities that best meet
the requirements of this section. A CONTRACT OR GRANT AWARDED
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION MUST BE COMPLETED BY JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-88-204, amend (1)
as follows:
8-88-204. Program to investigate, fund, and pilot projects or
programs to benefit individuals with disabilities.
(1) When adequate funding is available, the committee shall accept
and review proposals to fund projects or programs, or both, that study or
pilot new and innovative ideas that will lead to an improved quality of life
or increased independence for individuals with disabilities. Proposals may
be accepted throughout the year, and grants may be made by the committee
at its regular meetings. The fund is the sole source of money for any grants
made pursuant to this section. A CONTRACT OR GRANT AWARDED PURSUANT
TO THIS SECTION MUST BE COMPLETED BY JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 8. Repeal of relocated provisions in this act. In
Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 8-88-205 and 8-88-206.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 8-88-207 as
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1382

follows:
8-88-207. Sunset review - repeal of part.
This part 2 is repealed, effective September 1, 2029. Before the
repeal, this part 2 is scheduled for review in accordance with section
24-34-104 JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 3 to article
88 of title 8 as follows:
PART 3
COLORADO DISABILITY FUNDING AUTHORITY
8-88-301. Colorado disability funding authority - creation -
board.
(1) THERE IS CREATED THE COLORADO DISABILITY FUNDING
AUTHORITY. THE COLORADO DISABILITY FUNDING AUTHORITY IS A SPECIAL
PURPOSE AUTHORITY, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-77-102 (15), WHICH IS A
BODY CORPORATE AND A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE. THE
AUTHORITY IS NOT AN AGENCY OF STATE GOVERNMENT AND IS NOT SUBJECT
TO ADMINISTRATIVE DIRECTION BY ANY DEPARTMENT, COMMISSION, BOARD,
BUREAU, OR AGENCY OF THE STATE.
(2) (a) (I) THE AUTHORITY IS GOVERNED BY THE COLORADO
DISABILITY FUNDING AUTHORITY BOARD, WHICH CONSISTS OF THIRTEEN
MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR. THE MAJORITY OF AUTHORITY
BOARD MEMBERS ARE INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES, INDIVIDUALS WITH
IMMEDIATE FAMILY MEMBERS WITH DISABILITIES, OR INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE
CAREGIVERS TO A FAMILY MEMBER WITH A DISABILITY.
(II) IN MAKING THE APPOINTMENTS, THE GOVERNOR SHALL ENSURE
THAT THE AUTHORITY BOARD HAS MEMBERS WITH EXPERIENCE IN OR
KNOWLEDGE OF:
(A) BUSINESS AND BUSINESS MANAGEMENT;
(B) NONPROFIT ENTITIES AND MANAGING NONPROFIT ENTITIES;
(C) ADVOCACY FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES;
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1382

(D) THE PRACTICE OF MEDICINE, WITH EXPERIENCE WORKING WITH
INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES; AND
(E) THE PRACTICE OF LAW, WITH EXPERIENCE WORKING WITH
INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES.
(III) IN ADDITION TO THE REQUIREMENTS SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION
(2)(a)(II) OF THIS SECTION, WHEN MAKING APPOINTMENTS TO THE
AUTHORITY BOARD, THE GOVERNOR SHALL MAKE REASONABLE EFFORTS TO
APPOINT AUTHORITY BOARD MEMBERS WHO REFLECT THE GEOGRAPHIC AND
DEMOGRAPHIC DIVERSITY OF THE STATE, INCLUDING AUTHORITY BOARD
MEMBERS FROM RURAL AND URBAN AREAS OF THE STATE AND FROM DIVERSE
SOCIOECONOMIC STATUSES AND POLITICAL, RACIAL, ABILITY, AND CULTURAL
GROUPS.
(IV) MEMBERS OF THE AUTHORITY BOARD SERVE THREE-YEAR
TERMS; EXCEPT THAT THE TERMS MUST BE STAGGERED SO THAT NO MORE
THAN FIVE MEMBERS' TERMS EXPIRE IN THE SAME YEAR. THE GOVERNOR
SHALL NOT APPOINT A MEMBER FOR MORE THAN TWO CONSECUTIVE TERMS.
(b) (I) THE GOVERNOR SHALL APPOINT THE INITIAL AUTHORITY
BOARD MEMBERS ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 15, 2026. IN MAKING THE
INITIAL APPOINTMENTS, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INDICATE THE INITIAL TERM
LENGTH OF EACH INITIAL AUTHORITY BOARD MEMBER TO ENSURE THAT THE
TERMS OF THE AUTHORITY BOARD MEMBERS ARE STAGGERED AS REQUIRED
BY SUBSECTION (2)(a)(IV) OF THIS SECTION.
(II) THE GOVERNOR SHALL DESIGNATE ONE OF THE INITIAL
AUTHORITY BOARD MEMBERS TO SERVE AS THE INITIAL CHAIR OF THE
AUTHORITY BOARD. THE INITIAL CHAIR OF THE AUTHORITY BOARD MAY
ESTABLISH AND ADMINISTER MATTERS RELATED TO THE INITIAL START UP OF
THE AUTHORITY, INCLUDING STAFFING, LEGAL SERVICES, AND
COORDINATION WITH THE CDOO. ANY CONTRACTS ENTERED INTO BY THE
INITIAL CHAIR OF THE AUTHORITY BOARD MUST HAVE AN INITIAL TERM
ENDING ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2027, AND MUST BE REVIEWED BY THE
AUTHORITY BOARD AT ITS FIRST MEETING.
(c) A MEMBER MAY BE REMOVED FROM THE AUTHORITY BOARD BY:
(I) MAJORITY VOTE OF THE AUTHORITY BOARD FOR MISFEASANCE,
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1382

MALFEASANCE, WILLFUL NEGLECT OF DUTY, OR OTHER CAUSE AFTER NOTICE
AND A PUBLIC HEARING, UNLESS NOTICE AND A PUBLIC HEARING ARE
EXPRESSLY WAIVED IN WRITING BY THE MEMBER AT RISK OF BEING
REMOVED; OR
(II) THE GOVERNOR FOR CAUSE.
(d) (I) WITHIN THIRTY DAYS OF THE GOVERNOR'S INITIAL
APPOINTMENTS TO THE AUTHORITY BOARD PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(b)
OF THIS SECTION, THE INITIAL CHAIR OF THE AUTHORITY BOARD AS
DESIGNATED BY THE GOVERNOR SHALL SET DATES FOR THE FIRST AND
SECOND MEETINGS OF THE AUTHORITY BOARD. THE AUTHORITY BOARD
SHALL HOLD THE FIRST AND SECOND MEETINGS ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER
31, 2026. THE AUTHORITY BOARD MAY ELECT A NEW CHAIR AT EITHER ITS
FIRST OR SECOND MEETING. IF THE AUTHORITY BOARD DOES NOT ELECT A
NEW CHAIR, THE INITIAL CHAIR AS DESIGNATED BY THE GOVERNOR SHALL
SERVE IN THAT ROLE UNTIL THE FIRST MEETING OF THE AUTHORITY BOARD
IN CALENDAR YEAR 2028.
(II) THE AUTHORITY BOARD SHALL ELECT A CHAIR AND A VICE-CHAIR
AT ITS FIRST MEETING OF EACH CALENDAR YEAR, BEGINNING IN CALENDAR
YEAR 2028. THE CHAIR SHALL SCHEDULE THE MEETINGS OF THE AUTHORITY
BOARD.
(III) THE AUTHORITY BOARD MAY ELECT ONE OR MORE MEMBERS AS
SECRETARY AND TREASURER AND ELECT OR APPOINT OTHER OFFICERS AS
THE AUTHORITY BOARD MAY DETERMINE AND PROVIDE FOR THEIR DUTIES
AND TERMS OF OFFICE.
(e) MEMBERS OF THE AUTHORITY BOARD SERVE WITHOUT
COMPENSATION BUT MAY BE REIMBURSED FOR ACTUAL AND REASONABLE
EXPENSES INCURRED IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THEIR DUTIES, UPON
APPROVAL OF THE AUTHORITY BOARD AFTER PROVIDING DOCUMENTATION
SUPPORTING THE REIMBURSEMENT.
(f) MEMBERS OF THE AUTHORITY BOARD MAY PARTICIPATE IN ANY
AUTHORITY BOARD MEETING AND MAY VOTE USING A
TELECOMMUNICATIONS DEVICE, INCLUDING A CONFERENCE TELEPHONE,
VIDEO CONFERENCE, OR SIMILAR COMMUNICATIONS EQUIPMENT. A MEMBER
OF THE AUTHORITY BOARD WHO PARTICIPATES IN AN AUTHORITY BOARD
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1382

MEETING USING A TELECOMMUNICATIONS DEVICE IS CONSIDERED PRESENT
AT THE MEETING.
(g) (I) THE AUTHORITY BOARD SHALL ADOPT ITS OWN RULES OF
PROCEDURE AND KEEP A RECORD OF ALL PROCEEDINGS AND ACTS.
(II) (A) ALL AUTHORITY BOARD MEETINGS ARE OPEN TO THE PUBLIC
AND THE AUTHORITY BOARD SHALL COMPLY WITH THE OPEN MEETINGS
REQUIREMENTS OF A STATE PUBLIC BODY AS SET FORTH IN SECTION
24-6-402.
(B) ALL PUBLIC RECORDS OF THE AUTHORITY BOARD ARE SUBJECT
TO THE "COLORADO OPEN RECORDS ACT", PART 2 OF ARTICLE 72 OF TITLE
24.
(III) EVERY LEGISLATIVE ACT OF THE AUTHORITY BOARD OF A
GENERAL OR PERMANENT NATURE MUST BE BY RESOLUTION. ALL
RESOLUTIONS OF THE AUTHORITY BOARD MUST BE RECORDED AND
AUTHENTICATED BY THE SIGNATURE OF THE CHAIR, VICE-CHAIR, OR
SECRETARY OF THE AUTHORITY BOARD.
(h) ANY AUTHORITY BOARD MEMBER, OR EMPLOYEE, AGENT, OR
ADVISOR OF THE AUTHORITY WHO HAS A DIRECT OR INDIRECT INTEREST IN
ANY CONTRACT, GRANT, TRANSACTION, OR PROPOSAL BEFORE THE
AUTHORITY OR ANY DIRECT OR INDIRECT INTEREST IN AN ENTITY THAT
SUBMITS A PROPOSAL TO THE AUTHORITY SHALL DISCLOSE THEIR INTEREST
TO THE AUTHORITY. THE AUTHORITY BOARD MEMBER, OR EMPLOYEE,
AGENT, OR ADVISOR OF THE AUTHORITY WHO HAS THE DIRECT OR INDIRECT
INTEREST SHALL NOT PARTICIPATE IN THE DECISION TO APPROVE,
AUTHORIZE, OR FUND THE RELEVANT CONTRACT, GRANT, TRANSACTION, OR
PROPOSAL.
(i) AN ACT OF THE AUTHORITY IS VOID UNLESS A MAJORITY OF THE
APPOINTED MEMBERS OF THE AUTHORITY BOARD HAS VOTED IN FAVOR OF
THE ACT.
(3) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL IS THE LEGAL ADVISOR OF AND
COUNSEL TO THE AUTHORITY.
(4) EMPLOYEES OF THE AUTHORITY ARE EXEMPT FROM THE STATE
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1382

PERSONNEL SYSTEM BUT ARE, BY ACCEPTANCE OF EMPLOYMENT, SUBJECT
TO THE PROVISIONS OF ARTICLE 51 OF TITLE 24. THE AUTHORITY SHALL
PROVIDE FOR THE DEDUCTION OF EMPLOYER AND EMPLOYEE CONTRIBUTIONS
FROM SALARY AND FOR PAYMENT TO THE PUBLIC EMPLOYEES' RETIREMENT
ASSOCIATION, CREATED PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-51-201, OF DEDUCTIONS
AND ANY OTHER PAYMENTS THAT WOULD BE DUE FROM A STATE EMPLOYER.
(5) THE AUTHORITY SHALL NOT DISCRIMINATE BASED ON RACE,
CREED, COLOR, NATIONAL ORIGIN, ANCESTRY, RELIGION, SEX, GENDER,
SEXUAL ORIENTATION, GENDER IDENTITY, GENDER EXPRESSION, MARITAL
STATUS, FAMILIAL STATUS, MILITARY STATUS, OR DISABILITY.
(6) (a) THE INCOME, REVENUE, AND INTEREST THEREON OF THE
AUTHORITY AND ALL PROPERTY AT ANY TIME OWNED BY THE AUTHORITY
ARE EXEMPT FROM INCOME TAXATION, REAL AND PERSONAL PROPERTY
TAXATION, AND ALL OTHER TAXATION AND ASSESSMENTS IN THE STATE. THE
PURCHASE AND USE OF PROPERTY BY OR FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE
AUTHORITY IS EXEMPT FROM SALES AND USE TAXES IMPOSED BY THE STATE,
A COUNTY, A CITY AND COUNTY, A CITY, ANY OTHER POLITICAL SUBDIVISION
OF THE STATE, OR LOCAL GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY. THE AUTHORITY MAY
AGREE TO MAKE PAYMENTS IN LIEU OF PROPERTY OR SALES AND USE TAXES
TO THE STATE, A COUNTY, A CITY AND COUNTY, A CITY, ANY POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE, OR LOCAL GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY.
(b) A GIFT, DONATION, OR CONTRIBUTION TO OR FOR THE USE OF THE
AUTHORITY FOR USE IN CONNECTION WITH THE ACTIVITIES OF THE
AUTHORITY IS TREATED AS A GIFT TO A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE
STATE MADE EXCLUSIVELY FOR PUBLIC PURPOSES.
(7) THE AUTHORITY AND ITS CORPORATE EXISTENCE CONTINUES
UNTIL TERMINATED BY LAW; EXCEPT THAT NO SUCH LAW MAY TAKE EFFECT
SO LONG AS THE AUTHORITY HAS OBLIGATIONS OUTSTANDING, UNLESS
ADEQUATE PROVISION HAS BEEN MADE FOR THE PAYMENT OF THE
OBLIGATIONS. UPON TERMINATION OF THE EXISTENCE OF THE AUTHORITY,
ALL ITS RIGHTS AND PROPERTIES IN EXCESS OF ITS OBLIGATIONS PASS TO AND
ARE VESTED IN THE STATE.
8-88-302. Colorado disability funding authority - powers and
duties.
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1382

(1) THE AUTHORITY HAS AND MAY EXERCISE ALL RIGHTS AND
POWERS NECESSARY OR INCIDENTAL TO, OR IMPLIED FROM, THE SPECIFIC
POWERS GRANTED IN THIS PART 3, WHICH SPECIFIC POWERS SHALL NOT BE
CONSIDERED AS A LIMITATION UPON ANY POWER NECESSARY OR
APPROPRIATE TO CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES AND INTENT OF THIS PART 3. IN
ADDITION TO ANY OTHER POWERS GRANTED TO THE AUTHORITY IN THIS PART
3, THE AUTHORITY HAS THE DUTIES, PRIVILEGES, IMMUNITIES, RIGHTS,
LIABILITIES, AND DISABILITIES OF A BODY CORPORATE AND POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE AND THE DUTIES AND POWERS TO:
(a) HAVE PERPETUAL EXISTENCE AND SUCCESSION;
(b) ADOPT, HAVE, AND USE A SEAL AND TO ALTER THE SEAL AT ITS
PLEASURE;
(c) SUE AND BE SUED AND OTHERWISE ASSERT OR DEFEND THE
AUTHORITY'S LEGAL INTERESTS;
(d) FIX THE TIME AND PLACE AT WHICH MEETINGS MAY BE HELD;
(e) MAKE BUSINESS DECISIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS PART 3;
(f) MAKE AND EXECUTE AGREEMENTS, CONTRACTS, AND OTHER
INSTRUMENTS NECESSARY OR CONVENIENT IN THE EXERCISE OF THE POWERS
AND FUNCTIONS OF THE AUTHORITY PURSUANT TO THIS PART 3;
(g) PURCHASE, LEASE, LEASE WITH AN OPTION TO PURCHASE, TRADE,
EXCHANGE, OR OTHERWISE ACQUIRE, MAINTAIN, HOLD, IMPROVE,
MORTGAGE, ENCUMBER, AND DISPOSE OF REAL PROPERTY AND PERSONAL
PROPERTY, WHETHER TANGIBLE OR INTANGIBLE, AND ANY INTEREST,
INCLUDING EASEMENTS AND RIGHTS-OF-WAY, WITHOUT RESTRICTION OR
LIMITATION;
(h) ACQUIRE OFFICE SPACE, EQUIPMENT, SERVICES, SUPPLIES, AND
INSURANCE NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES OF THIS PART 3;
(i) APPOINT OR CONTRACT WITH AGENTS, EMPLOYEES, AND
PROFESSIONAL ADVISERS, AS MAY FROM TIME TO TIME BE NECESSARY IN THE
AUTHORITY'S JUDGMENT TO ACCOMPLISH THE PURPOSES OF THIS PART 3, AND
TO FIX THE COMPENSATION AND ESTABLISH THE DUTIES OF SUCH AGENTS,
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1382

EMPLOYEES, AND ADVISERS;
(j) DEPOSIT ANY MONEY OF THE AUTHORITY IN ANY BANKING
INSTITUTION OR IN ANY DEPOSITORY AUTHORIZED PURSUANT TO SECTION
24-75-603, AND TO APPOINT, FOR THE PURPOSE OF MAKING SUCH DEPOSITS,
ONE OR MORE INDIVIDUALS TO ACT AS CUSTODIANS OF THE AUTHORITY'S
MONEY; AND
(k) CONTRACT FOR AND TO SEEK AND ACCEPT ANY GIFTS, GRANTS,
OR DONATIONS AND LOANS OF FUNDS, PROPERTY, OR ANY OTHER AID IN ANY
FORM FROM THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, THE STATE, ANY STATE AGENCY,
ANY OTHER PUBLIC OR PRIVATE SOURCE, OR ANY COMBINATION THEREOF,
AND TO COMPLY, SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THIS PART 3, WITH THE
TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF SUCH CONTRACTS OR THE ACCEPTANCE OF SUCH
ITEMS.
(2) (a) THE AUTHORITY MAY ACCEPT ONE-TIME AND ANNUAL
DONATIONS FOR ELIGIBILITY FOR A LICENSE PLATE IN A RETIRED STYLE
PURSUANT TO SECTION 42-3-206.5. FOR THE PURPOSE OF MINIMIZING
COMPLIANCE COSTS FOR INDIVIDUALS AND ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS FOR THE
AUTHORITY, THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE SHALL COLLECT THE DONATIONS
ON BEHALF OF THE AUTHORITY. THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE SHALL NOT
TRANSMIT THE COLLECTED DONATIONS TO THE STATE TREASURER FOR
DEPOSIT TO ANY STATE FUND BUT SHALL INSTEAD REMIT THE DONATIONS
COLLECTED TO THE AUTHORITY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROCESS
DEVELOPED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2). ONE-TIME AND ANNUAL
DONATIONS COLLECTED AND REMITTED TO THE AUTHORITY DO NOT
CONSTITUTE STATE FISCAL YEAR SPENDING, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
24-77-102 (17), FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE
CONSTITUTION.
(b) THE AUTHORITY SHALL MAINTAIN AN ACCOUNT IN A FINANCIAL
INSTITUTION TO WHICH ALL MONEY COLLECTED FOR THE LICENSE PLATES IN
A RETIRED STYLE PURSUANT TO SECTION 42-3-206.5 IS DEPOSITED. THE
AUTHORITY SHALL WORK WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE TO DEVELOP
A PROCESS THAT ENSURES THAT THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE IS ABLE TO
DEPOSIT ALL DONATIONS COLLECTED DIRECTLY INTO THE ACCOUNT OR
OTHERWISE REMIT SUCH DONATIONS TO THE AUTHORITY.
(c) THE AUTHORITY MAY USE MONEY IN THE ACCOUNT FOR THE
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1382

AUTHORITY'S DIRECT AND INDIRECT EXPENSES IN ADMINISTERING THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS PART 3 AND ANY OTHER RELATED WORK THAT IS
COMPLETED TO ADVANCE THE AUTHORITY'S MISSION.
8-88-303. Program to assist individuals with disabilities -
assistance to obtain disability benefits.
(1) (a) THE AUTHORITY SHALL INVITE NONPROFIT ENTITIES,
INDEPENDENT LIVING CENTERS AS DEFINED IN SECTION 8-85-102 (5),
COUNTY DEPARTMENTS OF HUMAN SERVICES, COUNTY DEPARTMENTS OF
SOCIAL SERVICES, AND OTHER STATE AND COUNTY AGENCIES TO SUBMIT
PROPOSALS FOR PROGRAMS TO AID INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES IN
ACCESSING DISABILITY BENEFITS.
(b) TO QUALIFY FOR CONSIDERATION UNDER THIS SECTION, A
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION MUST BE BASED IN THE STATE AND:
(I) BE GOVERNED BY A BOARD:
(A) THAT IS COMPOSED OF PERSONS WITH A DEMONSTRATED
COMMITMENT TO IMPROVING THE LIVES OF RECIPIENTS WITH DISABILITIES;
(B) THAT INCLUDES MEMBERS WHO UNDERSTAND A RANGE OF
DISABILITIES; AND
(C) A MAJORITY OF THE MEMBERS OF WHICH ARE INDIVIDUALS WITH
DISABILITIES, INDIVIDUALS WITH IMMEDIATE FAMILY MEMBERS WITH
DISABILITIES, OR INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE CAREGIVERS TO A FAMILY MEMBER
WITH A DISABILITY; OR
(II) HAVE A CONTRACT WITH AN ORGANIZATION THAT MEETS THE
CRITERIA IN SUBSECTION (1)(b)(I) OF THIS SECTION.
(c) TO QUALIFY FOR CONSIDERATION UNDER THIS SECTION, A
COUNTY DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES, A COUNTY DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL SERVICES, OR ANOTHER STATE OR COUNTY AGENCY MUST HAVE A
CONTRACT WITH AN ORGANIZATION THAT MEETS THE CRITERIA IN
SUBSECTION (1)(b)(I) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) (a) (I) THE AUTHORITY SHALL REVIEW THE PROPOSED PROGRAMS
PAGE 15-HOUSE BILL 26-1382

AND, BEGINNING ON JULY 1, 2027, SHALL AWARD A CONTRACT OR GRANT TO
ONE OR MORE OF THE ENTITIES THAT BEST MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SECTION.
(II) THE TERM OF EACH CONTRACT OR GRANT IS UP TO THREE YEARS.
THE AUTHORITY SHALL INCLUDE EVALUATION CRITERIA IN THE CONTRACT
WITH METRICS THAT MUST BE MET AT LEAST ONCE A YEAR TO CONTINUE
FUNDING.
(b) IN AWARDING A CONTRACT OR GRANT, THE AUTHORITY SHALL
CONSIDER WHETHER THE PROPOSAL INCLUDES:
(I) A SYSTEM FOR EVALUATING WHETHER AN INDIVIDUAL WITH A
DISABILITY IS REASONABLY ABLE TO NAVIGATE THE APPLICATION PROCESS
TO OBTAIN DISABILITY BENEFITS, HEALTH CARE, AND EMPLOYMENT;
(II) A SYSTEM FOR PRIORITIZING THE NEED OF APPLICANTS BASED
UPON THE EVALUATIONS;
(III) A PLAN FOR ASSISTING INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES IN
NAVIGATING THE PROCESSES OF OBTAINING AND RETAINING DISABILITY
BENEFITS, HEALTH CARE, AND EMPLOYMENT;
(IV) A PLAN FOR ESTABLISHING WORKING RELATIONSHIPS WITH
STATE AGENCIES, COUNTY DEPARTMENTS OF HUMAN OR SOCIAL SERVICES,
HEALTH-CARE PROVIDERS, THE UNITED STATES SOCIAL SECURITY
ADMINISTRATION, AND THE BUSINESS COMMUNITY;
(V) A PLAN FOR ENCOURAGING INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES TO
APPLY FOR OPEN POSITIONS AND A PLAN FOR RETAINING EMPLOYEES WITH
DISABILITIES;
(VI) REASONABLE STANDARDS FOR ACCOUNTING CONTROL OF
EXPENDITURES; AND
(VII) METRICS TO EVALUATE THE PROGRAM'S QUALITY AND
COST-EFFECTIVENESS.
(c) THE AUTHORITY SHALL NOT DISCRIMINATE AGAINST AN
APPLICANT BASED ON THE APPLICANT'S ADVOCACY CONCERNING
PAGE 16-HOUSE BILL 26-1382

INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES.
(d) TO THE GREATEST EXTENT POSSIBLE, THE AUTHORITY SHALL
ENSURE, THROUGH ONE OR MORE CONTRACTS OR GRANTS PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION, THAT INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES ARE SERVED STATEWIDE.
(3) AN ENTITY AWARDED A CONTRACT OR GRANT UNDER THIS
SECTION SHALL MAKE QUARTERLY REPORTS OF EXPENDITURES TO THE
AUTHORITY. THE AUTHORITY SHALL INCLUDE IN THE CONTRACT OR GRANT
A METHOD AND FORMAT FOR MAKING THE REPORTS.
(4) THE AUTHORITY SHALL ESTABLISH RULES TO ENSURE MONEY
RECEIVED FROM A CONTRACT OR GRANT PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION IS USED
FOR THE PURPOSES SPECIFIED IN THIS SECTION.
8-88-304. Program to investigate, fund, and pilot projects or
programs to benefit individuals with disabilities.
(1) WHEN ADEQUATE FUNDING IS AVAILABLE, THE AUTHORITY SHALL
ACCEPT AND REVIEW PROPOSALS TO FUND PROJECTS OR PROGRAMS, OR
BOTH, THAT STUDY OR PILOT NEW AND INNOVATIVE IDEAS THAT WILL LEAD
TO AN IMPROVED QUALITY OF LIFE OR INCREASED INDEPENDENCE FOR
INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES. THE AUTHORITY MAY ACCEPT PROPOSALS
THROUGHOUT THE YEAR AND MAY MAKE GRANTS AT THE AUTHORITY'S
REGULAR MEETINGS ON AND AFTER JULY 1, 2027.
(2) TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR FUNDING PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, A
PROJECT OR PROGRAM MUST:
(a) DEMONSTRATE A CAPABILITY TO BE SELF-SUSTAINING OR
OTHERWISE BE ABLE TO DEVELOP LONG-TERM INDEPENDENT FUNDING; AND
(b) (I) HAVE A GOVERNING BODY, A BOARD, OR OWNERSHIP THAT IS
COMPOSED OF INDIVIDUALS WITH A DEMONSTRATED COMMITMENT TO
IMPROVING THE LIVES OF INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES, THE MAJORITY OF
WHOM ARE INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES, INDIVIDUALS WITH IMMEDIATE
FAMILY MEMBERS WITH DISABILITIES, OR INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE
CAREGIVERS TO A FAMILY MEMBER WITH A DISABILITY;
(II) FOR ORGANIZATIONS THAT DO NOT MEET THE GOVERNANCE
PAGE 17-HOUSE BILL 26-1382

REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (2)(b)(I) OF THIS SECTION, HAVE A GRANT
OVERSIGHT COMMITTEE APPROVED BY THE AUTHORITY THAT IS RESPONSIBLE
FOR ALL OVERSIGHT OF THE GRANT AND THAT IS COMPRISED OF INDIVIDUALS
WITH A DEMONSTRATED COMMITMENT TO IMPROVING THE LIVES OF
INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES, THE MAJORITY OF WHOM ARE INDIVIDUALS
WITH DISABILITIES, INDIVIDUALS WITH IMMEDIATE FAMILY MEMBERS WITH
DISABILITIES, OR INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE CAREGIVERS TO A FAMILY MEMBER
WITH A DISABILITY; OR
(III) IN THE CASE OF A SOLE PROPRIETORSHIP, HAVE AN OWNER WHO:
(A) IS AN INDIVIDUAL WITH A DISABILITY, AN INDIVIDUAL WITH AN
IMMEDIATE FAMILY MEMBER WITH A DISABILITY, AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A
CAREGIVER TO A FAMILY MEMBER WITH A DISABILITY, OR AN INDIVIDUAL
WITH A PROPOSAL THAT IS DESIGNED TO PROVIDE A POSITIVE IMPACT IN THE
DISABILITY COMMUNITY; AND
(B) HAS DEMONSTRATED COMMITMENT TO IMPROVING THE LIVES OF
INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES.
(3) THE AUTHORITY SHALL ESTABLISH RULES TO ENSURE MONEY
RECEIVED FROM A GRANT PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION IS USED FOR THE
PURPOSES SPECIFIED IN THIS SECTION.
8-88-305. Disabled parking education program.
(1) WHEN ADEQUATE FUNDING IS AVAILABLE, BEGINNING ON JULY
1, 2027, THE AUTHORITY MAY:
(a) MAKE GRANTS TO SUPPORT, OR DEVELOP, IMPLEMENT, OR
DELIVER, EDUCATION PROGRAMS CONCERNING:
(I) ELIGIBILITY STANDARDS FOR RESERVED PARKING THAT IS
AVAILABLE TO AN INDIVIDUAL WITH A DISABILITY AFFECTING MOBILITY;
(II) APPROPRIATE USE OF THE RESERVED PARKING THAT IS
AVAILABLE TO AN INDIVIDUAL WITH A DISABILITY AFFECTING MOBILITY;
(III) THE LEGAL STANDARDS AND VIOLATIONS CONTAINED IN
SECTIONS 42-3-204 AND 42-4-1208; AND
PAGE 18-HOUSE BILL 26-1382

(IV) THE ADVANTAGES OF CREATING A VOLUNTEER ENFORCEMENT
PROGRAM FOR RESERVED PARKING THAT IS AVAILABLE TO AN INDIVIDUAL
WITH A DISABILITY AFFECTING MOBILITY; AND
(b) CREATE OR MAKE AVAILABLE A TRAINING PROGRAM TO ASSIST
PROFESSIONALS IN UNDERSTANDING THE STANDARDS THAT NEED TO BE MET
TO OBTAIN AN IDENTIFYING LICENSE PLATE OR PLACARD FOR THE USE OF
RESERVED PARKING THAT IS AVAILABLE TO AN INDIVIDUAL WITH A
DISABILITY AFFECTING MOBILITY.
(2) EDUCATION PROGRAMS FUNDED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION ARE
INTENDED TO PROVIDE EDUCATION TO:
(a) PEACE OFFICERS;
(b) LOCAL GOVERNMENTS;
(c) ENTITIES THAT PROVIDE PARKING;
(d) ENTITIES THAT PROVIDE PRIVATE PARKING ENFORCEMENT,
INCLUDING TOW OPERATORS;
(e) MEDICAL PROVIDERS;
(f) DRIVERS; AND
(g) INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES.
(3) THE AUTHORITY SHALL ESTABLISH RULES TO ENSURE MONEY
RECEIVED FROM A GRANT PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION IS USED FOR THE
PURPOSES SPECIFIED IN THIS SECTION.
8-88-306. Annual performance and financial audit - report.
(1) (a) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2027, AND ON OR BEFORE EACH
DECEMBER 1 THEREAFTER, THE AUTHORITY SHALL PREPARE AND SUBMIT A
FINANCIAL AND PERFORMANCE REPORT TO THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE
OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY. AT A MINIMUM, THE REPORT MUST INCLUDE:
(I) HOW MUCH MONEY WAS COLLECTED IN DONATIONS AND
PAGE 19-HOUSE BILL 26-1382

DEPOSITED IN THE AUTHORITY'S ACCOUNT AS REQUIRED BY SECTION
8-88-302 (2)(a) IN THE PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR;
(II) A DESCRIPTION OF EVERY EXPENDITURE MADE BY THE
AUTHORITY IN THE PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR, INCLUDING GRANT OR
CONTRACT EXPENSES AND ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS, SUCH AS STAFF SALARIES
AND OPERATING EXPENSES;
(III) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF GRANT OR CONTRACT AWARDS MADE
IN THE PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR AND A DESCRIPTION OF THE TYPES OF
PROGRAMS AND SERVICES FUNDED BY THOSE GRANT OR CONTRACT AWARDS;
(IV) THE TOTAL NUMBER AND VALUE OF GRANTS OR CONTRACTS
THAT REMAIN OPEN FOR REIMBURSEMENT IN THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR;
AND
(V) THE TOTAL OF ANTICIPATED EXPENDITURES IN THE CURRENT
FISCAL YEAR.
(b) THE AUTHORITY SHALL PRESENT THE DECEMBER 2027 AND
DECEMBER 2028 ANNUAL REPORTS IN PERSON AT A MEETING OF THE JOINT
BUDGET COMMITTEE OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY. BEGINNING WITH THE
DECEMBER 2029 ANNUAL REPORT AND FOR EACH ANNUAL DECEMBER
REPORT THEREAFTER, THE AUTHORITY SHALL SUBMIT A WRITTEN REPORT
BUT IS NOT REQUIRED TO PRESENT THE REPORT IN PERSON.
(2) IN ADDITION TO THE ANNUAL REPORT REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION
(1) OF THIS SECTION, THE STATE AUDITOR SHALL, UPON THE AFFIRMATIVE
VOTE OF A MAJORITY OF THE MEMBERS OF THE LEGISLATIVE AUDIT
COMMITTEE CREATED PURSUANT TO SECTION 2-3-101, CONDUCT OR CAUSE
TO BE CONDUCTED POSTAUDITS OF THE AUTHORITY PURSUANT TO SECTION
2-3-103 (1)(b).
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-34-104, repeal
(30)(a)(IX) as follows:
24-34-104. General assembly review of regulatory agencies and
functions for repeal, continuation, or reestablishment - legislative
declaration - repeal.
PAGE 20-HOUSE BILL 26-1382

(30) (a) The following agencies, functions, or both, are scheduled
for repeal on September 1, 2029:
(IX) The assistance program for disability benefits under article 88
of title 8;
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-77-102, amend
(11)(b), (11)(c)(IX), (15)(b)(XXI), and (15)(b)(XXII); and add (11)(d) and
(15)(b)(XXIII) as follows:
24-77-102. Definitions.
As used in this article 77, unless the context otherwise requires:
(11) "Property sale" means:
(b) Any contract resulting in the payment of pecuniary compensation
to the state for permitting another to exploit, use, or market nonrenewable
natural resources which are located on real property owned by the state and
which are subject to depletion with use; or
(c) For state fiscal years commencing on or after July 1, 2024, a
transfer of rights in tangible or intangible property, excluding leasehold
interests, in which or to which the state has rights protected by law from the
state to any party for consideration. Such a transfer of rights includes:
(IX) The sale of wine for promotional purposes by the Colorado
wine industry development board, created in article 29.5 of title 35; OR
(d) FOR STATE FISCAL YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER JULY 1,
2025, SALES OF UNIQUELY VALUABLE VEHICLE REGISTRATION NUMBERS
PURSUANT TO SECTION 8-88-105.
(15) (b) "Special purpose authority" includes, but is not limited to:
(XXI) The equal justice authority created in section 13-5.7-202; and
(XXII) The building urgent infrastructure and leveraging dollars
authority created in section 24-117-104 (1); AND
PAGE 21-HOUSE BILL 26-1382

(XXIII) THE COLORADO DISABILITY FUNDING AUTHORITY CREATED
IN SECTION 8-88-301.
SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-1-226, add (3) as
follows:
42-1-226. Disabled parking education and enforcement fund -
created - transfer - repeal.
(3) (a) ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
THE UNEXPENDED AND UNENCUMBERED BALANCE OF THE DISABLED
PARKING EDUCATION AND ENFORCEMENT FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(b) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026.
SECTION 14. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-1-227, add (2) as
follows:
42-1-227. Disabled parking education program - repeal.
(2) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026.
SECTION 15. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-3-206.5, amend
(1)(a) introductory portion, (1)(b), and (2.5); and add (1)(c) as follows:
42-3-206.5. Issuance of plates in a retired style authorized -
additional fee - rules - repeal.
(1) (a) Beginning January 1, 2023, or when the department is able
to issue THE license plates, pursuant to section 8-88-202 (6)(i), whichever
is earlier, the department shall issue license plates in previously retired
styles for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or
recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds
empty weight that had:
(b) (I) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 30, 2026, the amount of the taxes
and fees for license plates in the previously retired style is the same as the
amount of the taxes and fees specified for regular motor vehicle plates plus
an annual fee of twenty-five dollars, which shall be credited to the disability
support fund created in section 8-88-205 SECTION 8-88-104.
PAGE 22-HOUSE BILL 26-1382

(II) THIS SUBSECTION (1)(b) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE OCTOBER 1,
2026.
(c) ON AND AFTER OCTOBER 1, 2026, THE AMOUNT OF THE TAXES
AND FEES FOR LICENSE PLATES IN THE PREVIOUSLY RETIRED STYLE IS THE
SAME AS THE AMOUNT OF THE TAXES AND FEES SPECIFIED FOR REGULAR
MOTOR VEHICLE PLATES; EXCEPT THAT THE DEPARTMENT SHALL COLLECT
THE FOLLOWING ADDITIONAL FEES AND DONATIONS:
(I) A ONE-TIME DONATION OF TWENTY-TWO DOLLARS AND FIFTY
CENTS FOR ISSUANCE OR REPLACEMENT OF THE LICENSE PLATE, WHICH MUST
BE REMITTED TO THE COLORADO DISABILITY FUNDING AUTHORITY CREATED
IN SECTION 8-88-301;
(II) A ONE-TIME FEE OF TWO DOLLARS AND FIFTY CENTS FOR
ISSUANCE OR REPLACEMENT OF THE LICENSE PLATE, WHICH MUST BE
TRANSMITTED TO THE STATE TREASURER, WHO SHALL CREDIT THE FEE TO
THE DISABILITY SUPPORT FUND CREATED IN SECTION 8-88-104;
(III) AN ANNUAL RENEWAL DONATION OF TWENTY-TWO DOLLARS
AND FIFTY CENTS, WHICH MUST BE REMITTED TO THE COLORADO DISABILITY
FUNDING AUTHORITY CREATED IN SECTION 8-88-301; AND
(IV) AN ANNUAL RENEWAL FEE OF TWO DOLLARS AND FIFTY CENTS,
WHICH MUST BE TRANSMITTED TO THE STATE TREASURER, WHO SHALL
CREDIT THE FEE TO THE DISABILITY SUPPORT FUND CREATED IN SECTION
8-88-104.
(2.5) The Colorado disability funding committee is responsible for
the costs of designing the previously retired license plate styles and shall
pay such costs before the license plates are produced. The design for the
previously retired license plate styles shall MUST conform with standards
established by the department. After January 1, 2028, the department may
stop producing plates in a previously retired style if the department
determines that demand for that style, including willingness to pay an
additional fee that fully defrays the costs of producing the license plates in
the style, is not sufficiently high to justify production of the license plates.
SECTION 16. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-3-211, amend
(3)(a) as follows:
PAGE 23-HOUSE BILL 26-1382

42-3-211. Issuance of personalized plates authorized.
(3) (a) Personalized license plates must be the same color and design
as regular motor vehicle license plates, must consist of any combination of
numbers or letters not exceeding seven positions and not less than two
positions, except as otherwise provided in section 8-88-206 (4) SECTION
8-88-105 (4), and must not conflict with existing passenger, commercial,
trailer, motorcycle, or other special license plates series; except that
personalized license plates bearing the words "street rod" shall MUST be of
a design determined by the executive director of the department, which
design shall MUST be different from those used by the state for regular
motor vehicle license plates.
SECTION 17. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-4-1208, repeal
(6)(k) as follows:
42-4-1208. Reserved parking for persons with disabilities -
applicability - rules - standards - legislative declaration - definitions.
(6) Enforcement of reserved parking.
(k) The state or local authority issuing a citation under this section,
or under any local ordinance defining a substantially equivalent offense,
shall transfer one-half of the fine to the state treasurer, who shall credit the
fine to the disabled parking education and enforcement fund created in
section 42-1-226.
SECTION 18. Appropriation - adjustments to 2026 long bill.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, to implement this
act, the cash funds appropriation from the disabled parking education and
enforcement fund created in section 42-1-226 (1), C.R.S., made in the
general appropriations act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department
of labor and employment for use by the Colorado disability opportunity
office for operating expenses is decreased by $100,000.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not require a reduction of an
appropriation in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year if:
(a) The amount of the cash funds appropriation from the disabled
PAGE 24-HOUSE BILL 26-1382

parking education and enforcement fund created in section 42-1-226 (1),
C.R.S., made in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year to the department of labor and employment for the Colorado
disability opportunity office for operating expenses is less than the amount
of the adjustment required in subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) The annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal
year does not include an appropriation to the department of labor and
employment for the Colorado disability opportunity office for operating
expenses.
SECTION 19. Appropriation. (1) For the 2026-27 state fiscal
year, $1,000,000 is appropriated to the department of labor and employment
for use by the division of vocational rehabilitation and independent living
services. This appropriation is from the disability support fund created in
section 8-88-104 (1), C.R.S. To implement this act, the division may use
this appropriation for vocational rehabilitation services.
(2) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year, $27,000 is appropriated to the
department of revenue for use by the division of motor vehicles. This
appropriation is from the disability support fund created in section 8-88-104
(1), C.R.S. To implement this act, the division may use this appropriation
for DRIVES maintenance and support.
SECTION 20. Effective date. (1) Except as otherwise provided in
this section, this act takes effect upon passage.
(2) This act takes effect upon passage; except that section 18 of this
act takes effect only if the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27
state fiscal year becomes law, in which case section 18 takes effect upon the
effective date of this act or of the annual general appropriation act for state
fiscal year 2026-27, whichever is later.
(3) Section 8-88-101 (2), Colorado Revised Statutes, repealed in
section 1 of this act, and section 24-34-104, Colorado Revised Statutes,
amended in section 11 of this act, take effect on July 1, 2027.
SECTION 21. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 25-HOUSE BILL 26-1382

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 26-HOUSE BILL 26-1382